Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB686.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1.2(d) of the act of February 13, 1970 (P.L.19, No.10), entitled "An act enabling certain minors to consent to medical, dental and health services, declaring consent unnecessary under certain circumstances," is amended to read:Section 1.2. Release of Medical Records.--* * *(d) Except to the extent provided under subsection (a), (b) or (c) or section 1.3, the minor shall control the release of the minor's mental health treatment records and information to the extent allowed by law. When a minor has provided consent to outpatient mental health treatment under section 1.1, subject to 12345678910111213141516171819 subsection (a)(2), the minor shall control the records of treatment to the same extent as the minor would control the records of inpatient care or involuntary outpatient care under the act of July 9, 1976 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the "Mental Health Procedures Act," and its regulations.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1.3. Parent or Legal Guardian Access to Medical Records.--Subject to Federal law, a parent or legal guardian of a minor under eighteen years of age shall have full access to the minor's medical, dental or health services or mental health treatment records.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0686PN0702 - 2 - 12345678910111213